District of Columbia statutes.
6-1111

Insanitary and unsafe buildings.

(a)

Nothing in this subchapter shall interfere with the authority of the Board for the Condemnation of Insanitary Buildings to put a building or structure into sanitary condition or to demolish it pursuant to the provisions of the Act of May 1, 1906 (Chapter 9 of this title); except, that no permit for the demolition of an historic landmark or building or structure in an historic district shall be issued to the owner except in accordance with the provisions of this subchapter.

(b)

Nothing in this subchapter shall affect the authority of the District of Columbia to secure or remove an unsafe building or structure pursuant to the Act of March 1, 1899 (Chapter 8 of this title).

(c)

Except as provided under subchapter II of Chapter 31C of Title 42, nothing in this subchapter shall affect the authority of the Mayor to enclose or demolish a structure under subchapter II of Chapter 31C of Title 42.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-144, § 12, 25 DCR 6939
Apr. 19 2002, D.C. Law 14-114, § 102, 49 DCR 1468
Oct. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-213, § 14, 49 DCR 8140
1981 Ed., § 5-1011.
1973 Ed., § 5-831.
D.C. Law 14-114 added subsec. (c).
D.C. Law 14-213, in subsec. (c), validated previously made technical corrections.
Because of the codification of D.C. Law 5-69 as subchapter II of this chapter, and the designation of the preexisting text of Chapter 11 as subchapter I, “subchapter” has been substituted for “chapter,” where applicable, in this section.